District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0063.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Advancing Equity in Special Education Protocols Amendment Act of
2025”.


Sec. 2. The Special Education Procedural Protections Expansion Act of 2014, effective
March 10, 2015 (D.C. Law 20-194; D.C. Official Code § 38-2571.01 et seq), is amended as
follows:
(a) Section 101 (D.C. Official Code § 38-2571.01), is amended by adding a new
paragraph (4A) to read as follows:
“(4A) “Self-contained special education classroom” means a full-time, outside of
general-education classroom that provides instruction for students in accordance with their
IEPs.”.
(b) Section 103 (D.C. Official Code § 38-2571.03) is amended as follows:
(1) The existing language is redesignated as subsection (b).
(2) A new subsection (a) is added to read as follows:
“(a) A child with a disability has the right to continue with their initial placement’s feeder
pattern as that term is defined in section 1102a(2A) of the School Based Budgeting and
Accountability Act of 1998, effective June 21, 2014 (D.C. Law 20-114; D.C. Official Code § 38-
2801.01(2A)), unless the new service location within the feeder pattern does not have special
education services available that would support the child’s IEP.”.
(3) Subsection (b)(1) is amended to read as follows:
“(b)(1) Before any change in service location for a child with a disability is made,
the LEA shall consult with the child’s IEP team as defined by 20 USC § 1414 (d)(1) and shall
provide the IEP team with written notice of the proposed change, which shall at minimum
include:”.
(4) Subsection (b)(1)(B) is amended to read as follows:
“(B) An explanation of the following:


(i) Why the LEA proposes to take the action; and
(ii) Why the special education services in the current feeder
pattern cannot meet the student’s needs, if the action removes the child from their current
placement’s feeder pattern;”.
(c) New sections 105 and 106 are added to read as follows:
“Sec. 105. Self-contained classroom size.
“If the student to staff ratio in a self-contained special education classroomexceeds the
ratio set by the rules promulgated pursuant to section 106, an LEA shall provide a written
explanation to the special education teacher in an affected self-contained special education
classroom, the parents of the students in an affected self-contained special education classroom,
and school administrators, describing the additional resources or personnel that will be allocated
to a self-contained special education classroom to meet each student’s needs as defined by their
IEP, within 5 business days.”.
“Sec. 106. Rulemaking.
“The Mayor, pursuant to Title I of the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure
Act, approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; D.C. Official Code § 2-501 et seq.), shall
promulgate rules to implement the provisions of this title no later than 120 days after the
effective date of this section.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.


This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).